District of Columbia statutes.
28:9-709

Priority.

(a)

This article determines the priority of conflicting claims to collateral. However, if the relative priorities of the claims were established before July 1, 2001, former Article 9 determines priority.

(b)

For purposes of § 28:9-322(a), the priority of a security interest that becomes enforceable under § 28:9-203 dates from July 1, 2001 if the security interest is perfected under this article by the filing of a financing statement before July 1, 2001 which would not have been effective to perfect the security interest under former Article 9. This subsection does not apply to conflicting security interests each of which is perfected by the filing of such a financing statement.

Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-201, § 101, 47 DCR 7576